Illinois, session 104th, HB2869.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Aid Code is amended by 5adding Section 12-21.22 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 5/12-21.22 new)7    Sec. 12-21.22. Therapeutic recreation waiver services for 8persons with developmental disabilities. The Department of 9Healthcare and Family Services, in consultation with the 10Department of Human Services, shall submit the necessary 11application to the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid 12Services to amend the State's home and community-based 13services waiver programs for children and adults with 14developmental disabilities to provide coverage under the 15Home-Based Services Program for any therapeutic recreation 16programs offered by park districts, health clubs, and 17community colleges.